Washington statutes.
RCW 18.04.065

Board—Fees—Disposition.

The board shall set its fees at a level adequate to pay the costs of administering this chapter. All fees for licenses, registrations of nonlicensee partners, shareholders, and managers of licensed firms, renewals of licenses, renewals of registrations of nonlicensee partners, shareholders, and managers of licensed firms, reinstatements of lapsed licenses, reinstatements of lapsed registrations of nonlicensee partners, shareholders, and managers of licensed firms, practice privileges under RCW 18.04.350, and delinquent filings received under the authority of this chapter shall be deposited in the certified public accountants' account created by RCW 18.04.105. Appropriation from such account shall be made only for the cost of administering the provisions of this chapter or for the purpose of administering the certified public accounting scholarship program created in chapter 28B.123 RCW.

[ 2022 c 85 s 4; 2015 c 215 s 6; 2001 c 294 s 6; 1992 c 103 s 6; 1983 c 234 s 24.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2001 c 294: See note following RCW 18.04.015.